Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 5

Transportation

33-2-501. Transportation options.

The department shall develop an array of options for transportation for all regions of the state that shall include, but not be limited to, willing family members, transportation agents that are available twenty-four (24) hours per day, ambulance or other medically appropriate vehicles, law enforcement, and public and private service providers.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 33-2-101 — 33-2-108, 33-2-201 — 33-2-202, 33-2-301 — 33-2-311, 33-2-401, 33-2-501 — 33-2-513, 33-2-601 — 33-2-602, 33-2-604, 33-2-701, 33-2-901 — 33-2-909 (Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 3, 4; 1974, ch. 802, § 8; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(35); 1978, ch. 617, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, §§ 1-9, 11-13; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1979, ch. 369, § 1; 1981, ch. 18, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 5; 1981, ch. 436, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 436, § 3; 1982, ch. 584, §§ 2, 4-12; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25-28, 31; 33-201, T.C.A. § 33-350, 33-1801, T.C.A., §§ 33-1803 — 33-1812, T.C.A., §§ 33-1902 — 33-1911; 1985, ch. 437, § 5, 31-32; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 1, 6; 1987, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 320, § 1; 1988, ch. 586, § 1; 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3-8; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 253, § 3; 1989, ch. 254, § 3; 1989, ch. 255, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1989, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 259, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 3; 1989, ch. 261, § 3; 1989, ch. 271, § 3; 1989, ch. 272, § 3; 1989, ch. 434, § 5; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1989, ch. 559, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1991, ch. 459, §§ 9, 10; 1992, ch. 913, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, §§ 22-26; 1994, ch. 760, § 1; 1996, ch. 796, § 1; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; 1998, ch. 1005, § 1-9; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-2-603 (Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 31; 1987, ch. 143, § 5), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 586, § 2; § 33-2-801 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 9; §§ 33-2-802 and 33-2-803 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which were transferred to §§ 68-24-602, 68-24-603 in 1993, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-2-502. Meeting on transportation services.

The department shall, at least annually, convene a meeting on transportation service for persons with developmental disabilities, mental illness, and serious emotional disturbance. The purpose is to promote development of interagency agreements under § 33-1-308 that assure availability of generic and specialized transportation services to service recipients and their families, coordinate service options, coordinate and maximize utilization of funding mechanisms, and assure training of transportation personnel in best practices for transporting service recipients. Participants shall include affected state agencies, local government, public and private transportation service providers, mental health and developmental disabilities service providers, and service recipients and members of service recipient families. There shall be a sufficient number of service recipients and their family members to assure effective representation in the meeting.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.